Washington statutes.
RCW 3.38.030

Districting plan—Adoption.

Upon receipt of the districting plan, the county legislative authority shall hold a public hearing, pursuant to the provisions of RCW 36.32.120(7), as now or hereafter amended. At the hearing, anyone interested in the plan may attend and be heard as to the convenience which will be afforded to the public by the plan, and as to any other matters pertaining thereto. If the county legislative authority finds that the plan proposed by the districting committee conforms to the standards set forth in chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW and is conducive to the best interests and welfare of the county as a whole it may adopt such plan. If the county legislative authority finds that the plan does not conform to the standards as provided in chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW, the county legislative authority may modify, revise or amend the plan and adopt such amended or revised plan as the county's district court districting plan. The plan decided upon shall be adopted by the county legislative authority not later than six months after the county initially obtains a population of two hundred ten thousand or more or the adoption of the elective resolution.

[ 1991 c 363 s 5; 1984 c 258 s 25; 1965 ex.s. c 110 s 2; 1961 c 299 s 27.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.